Illinois, session 104th, HB3975.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Energy Conservation and Coal Development 5Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1105/10)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 7410)7    Sec. 10. Evaluation of loan applications. The The 8Department shall evaluate applications for loans and make such 9evaluations available to the Illinois Coal Development Board. 10Evaluation of the loan applications shall be based on, but not 11limited to, the following criteria:12    (a) The length of time applicants will commit to using 13Illinois coal in the facility which is modified, acquired or 14constructed as a result of the project. The applicant must 15agree to use Illinois coal for at least the life of the loan as 16a condition of such loan. Weight shall be given for longer 17commitments.18    (b) The total amount of Illinois coal used. Weight shall 19be given to projects using larger amounts of Illinois coal 20over the life of the loan.21    (c) The percentage of the total project costs the State is 22asked to finance. Weight shall be given to projects which 23maximize the use of private funds or funds from other public   HB3975- 2 -LRB104 12465 AAS 22794 b1sources.2    (d) The technical merits of the project, including but not 3limited to, the effectiveness of the prepared coal-use system 4in controlling emissions of sulfur dioxide and other 5pollutants.6(Source: P.A. 84-111; 84-1070.)